Utah statutes.
53A-15-701.   Highly impacted schools.
(1)  There is established a Highly Impacted Schools Program to provide
additional resources for individual assistance to students at those schools
determined by the board to be highly impacted.
(2) (a)  The State Board of Education, in consultation with the governor's
office, shall base its determination of highly impacted schools on the
following criteria as reported by the schools in their applications:
(i)  high student mobility rates within each school;
(ii)  the number and percentage of students at each school who apply for free
school lunch;
(iii)  the number and percentage of ethnic minority students at each school;
(iv)  the number and percentage of limited English proficiency students at
each school; and
(v)  the number and percentage of students at each school from a single parent
family.
(b)  As used in this section, "single parent family" means a household headed
by a male without a wife present or by a female without a husband present.
(3) (a)  The board, through the state superintendent of public instruction,
shall establish application deadlines for participation in the program.
(b) (i) The appropriation required to implement the Highly Impacted Schools
Program shall be made under Title 53A, Chapter 17a, Minimum School Program
Act.
(ii)  The state superintendent of public instruction shall administer and
distribute the appropriation to individual schools according to a formula
established by the board.
(c) (i)  Each participating school shall receive a base allocation from the
appropriation.
(ii)  Additional money from the appropriation shall be allocated on the basis
of a formula which takes into consideration the total number of students at
each participating school and the number of students at each school who are
within the categories listed in Subsection (2).
(4)  This appropriation is in addition to any appropriation made for class-
size reduction under Section 53A-17a-124.5.
(5)  A highly impacted school may use part or all of its allocation to
lengthen the school year or extend the school day in order to provide
individual assistance to students.
(6)  The board shall monitor the program and require each participant school
to file a report on the use and effectiveness of the appropriation in meeting
the educational needs and involving parents of students who attend these
highly impacted schools.
